District of Columbia statutes.
3-404

Fees.

(a)

The Mayor may establish, by rule, a fee schedule for all services related to the regulation of the practice of funeral directing. The fees shall be reasonably related to the cost of administering the licensing, certification, or registration, including the cost of testing, processing, and issuing the license, certificate, or registration, and a proportionate share of the cost of running the Board and any hearing procedures, and other administrative functions. Application fees paid under this section shall not be refundable, even if the applicant withdraws his or her application for licensure, certification, or registration, or is found by the Board to be not qualified.

(b)

The Mayor may establish and change the expiration date of licenses provided for in this chapter. Upon the change of an expiration date, the renewal fee for licenses shall be prorated on the basis of the time covered.

History

May 22, 1984, D.C. Law 5-84, § 5, 31 DCR 1815
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2082(b), 57 DCR 6242

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2804.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-223 rewrote the section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2082(b) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 5-84, see Mayor’s Order 87-186, August 3, 1987.